Tennessee, session 114, HB1425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 120 of the Private Acts of 1953, as amended and rewritten by
Chapter 29 of the Private Acts of 2009, as amended by Chapter 18 of the Private Acts of 2015,
and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended in Article IV by deleting Section D in its
entirety and substituting instead:
Section D. Salaries. The annual salary for the mayor shall be not less than
eighteen thousand and two hundred dollars ($18,200), paid in no more than monthly
payments of one thousand five hundred and sixteen dollars and sixty-six cents
($1,516.66). The council may, by ordinance, set the annual salary and fringe benefits of
the council, but any ordinance establishing, increasing, or decreasing such salary shall
be in accordance with Article XI, Section 9 of the Tennessee State Constitution. The
salary of the council members shall be no less than one thousand and eight hundred
dollars ($1,800) annual salary paid in no more than monthly installments of one hundred
and fifty dollars ($150).
The mayor and council shall be entitled to reimbursement for the expenses they
incur in the performance of the duties of their offices, under the provisions of the adopted
travel and reimbursement ordinance or resolution approved by the council.
SECTION 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter the salary of any incumbent
prior to the end of the term for which such elected official was selected, as prescribed in Article
XI, Section 9 of the Constitution of the State of Tennessee.
HB1425
004144
- 1 -

SECTION 3. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Red Boiling Springs. Its approval or nonapproval shall be
proclaimed by the presiding officer of the City of Red Boiling Springs and certified to the
secretary of state.
SECTION 4. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 3.
- 2 - 004144